Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB712.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1501.2. Reports of 911 system outages to commission.(a) Reports.-- A local exchange telecommunications company that experiences a service or facilities failure resulting in a 911 system outage shall immediately report the outage to the commission upon discovering the outage. The commission may deem a local exchange telecommunications company that fails to comply with this section to be in violation of section 1501 (relating to character of service and facilities).(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 1234567891011121314151617 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"911 system." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 5302 (relating to definitions)."Local exchange telecommunications company ." As defined in section 3012 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0712PN0731 - 2 - 123456